th: ประเภทเอฟเฟกต์ระเบิดมือ: แฟลชแบง; สะเก็ดระเบิด; สี; ผง; ฝึกซ้อม; จำลอง; ควัน; เสียง; เทอร์โมบาริก; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di effetto granata: Flashbang; A frammentazione; Vernice; Polvere; Da addestramento; Da simulazione; Fumogena; Sonora; Termobarica; Altro
nb: Granateffekttype: Sjokkgranat; Splint; Maling; Pulver; Øvelse; Simulering; Røyk; Lyd; Termobar; Annet
ko: 수류탄 효과 유형: 섬광탄; 파편탄; 페인트; 분말; 연습용; 시뮬레이션; 연막; 음향; 열압력; 기타
el: Τύπος εφέ χειροβομβίδας: Κρότου-λάμψης; Θραυσματοποίησης; Χρώματος; Σκόνης; Εκπαίδευσης; Προσομοίωσης; Καπνού; Ήχου; Θερμοβαρική; Άλλο
ja: グレネード効果タイプ: フラッシュバン; 破片; ペイント; パウダー; 練習用; シミュレーション; スモーク; 音響; サーモバリック; その他
zh-CN: 手雷效果类型: 闪光弹; 破片杀伤; 颜料弹; 粉末弹; 训练; 模拟; 烟雾; 声响; 温压; 其他
nl: Granaat effecttype: Flashbang; Fragmentatie; Verf; Poeder; Oefening; Simulatie; Rook; Geluid; Thermobarisch; Overig
sl-SI: Vrsta učinka granate: Šok granata (flashbang); Razpršilna; Barvna; Prašna; Za vadbo; Simulacijska; Dimna; Zvočna; Termobarična; Drugo
hu: Gránáthatás típusa: Fény- és hanggránát; Repeszgránát; Festékgránát; Porgránát; Gyakorló; Szimulációs; Füstgránát; Hanggránát; Termobárikus; Egyéb
da: Type af granateffekt: Flashbang; Fragmentering; Maling; Pulver; Øvelse; Simulation; Røg; Lyd; Termobarisk; Andet
en: Grenade effect type: Flashbang; Fragmentation; Paint; Powder; Practice; Simulation; Smoke; Sound; Thermobaric; Other
de: Art des Granateneffekts: Blendgranate; Splitter; Farbe; Pulver; Übung; Simulation; Rauch; Schall; Thermobarisch; Sonstige
sv: Typ av granateffekt: Chockgranat; Splitter; Färg; Pulver; Övning; Simulering; Rök; Ljud; Termobarisk; Övrigt
zh-TW: 彩彈手榴彈效果類型: 閃光彈; 破片彈; 漆彈; 粉末; 練習彈; 模擬彈; 煙霧彈; 震撼彈; 溫壓彈; 其他
sk-SK: Typ efektu granátu: Zábleskový (flashbang); Trieštivý; Farba; Prášok; Cvičný; Simulačný; Dymový; Zvukový; Termobarický; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de efeito granada: Flashbang; Fragmentação; Tinta; Pó; Prática; Simulação; Fumo; Som; Termobárica; Outro
vi: Loại hiệu ứng lựu đạn: Choáng; Phân mảnh; Sơn; Bột; Luyện tập; Mô phỏng; Khói; Âm thanh; Nhiệt áp; Khác
cs: Typ efektu granátu: Zábleskový; Tříštivý; Barvicí; Práškový; Cvičný; Simulační; Kouřový; Zvukový; Termobarický; Ostatní
fi: Kranaatin vaikutustyyppi: Valokranaatti; Sirpalekranaatti; Maali; Jauhe; Harjoitus; Simulaatio; Savu; Ääni; Termobaarinen; Muu
es: Tipo de efecto granada: Cegadora; Fragmentación; Pintura; Polvo; Práctica; Simulación; Humo; Sonido; Termobárico; Otro
tr: El bombası etkisi türü: Flaş bombası; Parça tesirli; Boya; Toz; Pratik; Simülasyon; Sis; Ses; Termobarik; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип ефект на гранатата: Светошумова; Осколъчна; С боя; Прахообразна; Учебна; Симулационна; Димна; Звукова; Термобарична; Друго
ro-RO: Tipul efectului de grenadă: Flashbang; Fragmentare; Vopsea; Pulbere; Antrenament; Simulare; Fum; Sunet; Termobarică; Altele
pt-BR: Granada tipo de efeito: Flashbang; Fragmentação; Tinta; Pó; Prática; Simulação; Fumaça; Som; Termobárica; Outro
pl: Typ efektu granatu: Hukowo-błyskowy; Odłamkowy; Z farbą; Proszkowy; Ćwiczebny; Symulacyjny; Dymny; Hukowy; Termobaryczny; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta efekta granate: Flashbang; Fragmentacija; Boja; Prah; Za vježbu; Simulacija; Dim; Zvuk; Termobarično; Ostalo
fr: Type d’effet de grenade: Flashbang; Fragmentation; Peinture; Poudre; Entraînement; Simulation; Fumigène; Sonore; Thermobarique; Autre
ru: Тип эффекта гранаты: Светошумовая; Осколочная; С краской; Порошковая; Учебная; Имитационная; Дымовая; Шумовая; Термобарическая; Другое
lt-LT: Granatos efekto tipas: Akinamoji / garsinė; Skeveldrinė; Dažų; Miltelinė; Mokomoji; Imitacinė; Dūminė; Garsinė; Termobarinė; Kita